data/sources/glossaries/co/raw/apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="/u__det">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" c="poesia"><p><l>lu</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" c="poesia"><p><l>la</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" c="poesia"><p><l>le</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" c="poesia"><p><l>li</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>i</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>e</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="unepoch/i__det">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="alcun/u__det">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l></l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="nissun/u__det">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l></l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="un__det">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tal/e__det">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <pardef n="quell/u__det">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <pardef n="tutt/u__predet">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="ogni__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>
    
    
   
     <pardef n="st/u__det">
		<e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="eiu__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tù__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ell/u__prn">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="edd/u__prn">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ess/a__prn">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="noi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="voi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    


    <pardef n="mi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ti__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="si__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ci__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="nim/u__prn">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="altr/u__prn">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="nunda__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 <pardef n="ciò__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
 
 <pardef n="edda__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="ne__prn">
    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    
    
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cosa__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="u"><i></i><par n="/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="un__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tuttu"><i>tutt</i><par n="tutt/u__predet"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni"><i>ogni</i><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="calchì"><i>calchì</i><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="calchì" r="LR"><p><l>qualchì</l><r>calchì</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="uni pochi"><i>uni<b/>pochi</i><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sto"><i>st</i><par n="st/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="parechju"><i>parechj</i><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tale"><i>tal</i><par n="tal/e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="unepochi"><i>unepoch</i><par n="unepoch/i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="alcunu"><i>alcun</i><par n="alcun/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nissunu"><i>nissun</i><par n="nissun/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nissunu" r="LR"><p><l>nisun</l><r>nissun</r></p><par n="nissun/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="quellu"><i>quell</i><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="quiddu"><i>quidd</i><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="quiddu" r="LR"><p><l>idd</l><r>quidd</r></p><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="quessu" r="LR"><p><l>quess</l><r>'ss</r></p><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="questu" r="LR"><p><l>quest</l><r>'ss</r></p><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="questu" r="LR"><p><l>quist</l><r>'ss</r></p><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'ssu"><i>'ss</i><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'ssu" r="LR"><p><l>ss</l><r>'ss</r></p><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'ssu" r="LR"><p><l>iss</l><r>'ss</r></p><par n="quell/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="eiu"><i>eiu</i><par n="eiu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="eiu" r="LR"><p><l>eo</l><r>eiu</r></p><par n="eiu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mè"><i>mè</i><par n="eiu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tù"><i>tù</i><par n="tù__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tè"><i>tè</i><par n="tù__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ellu"><i>ell</i><par n="ell/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="eddu"><i>edd</i><par n="edd/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="eddu" r="LR"><p><l>idd</l><r>edd</r></p><par n="edd/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="essu"><i>ess</i><par n="altr/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nimu"><i>nim</i><par n="nim/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="qualcunu"><i>qualcun</i><par n="nim/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ugnunu"><i>ugnun</i><par n="nim/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="noi"><i>noi</i><par n="noi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="noi" r="LR"><p><l>no</l><r>noi</r></p><par n="noi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="voi"><i>voi</i><par n="voi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="voi" r="LR"><p><l>vo</l><r>voi</r></p><par n="voi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mi"><i>mi</i><par n="mi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ti"><i>ti</i><par n="ti__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="si__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ci"><i>ci</i><par n="ci__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vi"><i>vi</i><par n="vi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="altru"><i>altr</i><par n="altr/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quiss"><i>quiss</i><par n="altr/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nissunu"><i>nissun</i><par n="altr/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nissunu" r="LR"><p><l>nisun</l><r>nissun</r></p><par n="altr/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ognunu"><i>ognun</i><par n="altr/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ciò"><i>ciò</i><par n="ciò__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nunda"><i>nunda</i><par n="nunda__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="qualcosa"><i>qualcosa</i><par n="nunda__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="qualchissia"><i>qualchissia</i><par n="nunda__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="ne__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ci"><i>ci</i><par n="ne__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="edda"><i>edda</i><par n="edda__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cosa"><i>cosa</i><par n="cosa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quale"><i>quale</i><par n="cosa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="què"><i>què</i><par n="cosa__prn"/></e>
